California, session 20252026, SB379.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 6609.4 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:6609.4. (a) This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Sexually Violent Predator Accountability, Fairness, and Enforcement Act.(b) The State Department of State Hospitals is responsible for ensuring that department vendors consider public safety in the placement of a sexually violent predator conditionally released pursuant to this article.(c) (1) The State Department of State Hospitals shall approve a potential placement before a department employee or vendor proposes a potential placement to a court, including signing a lease or rental agreement regarding the placement of a sexually violent predator who is scheduled to be conditionally released in the community.(2) This subdivision does not prohibit the placement of a financial hold on a residence for purposes of assessing suitability and public safety considerations for the prospective placement of a person committed as a sexually violent predator.SEC. 2. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order to protect the public and ensure greater transparency in the placement of sexually violent predators in communities at the earliest possible time, it is necessary for this act to take effect immediately.